Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1315.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 46.61.502 and 2024 c 306 s 30 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A person is guilty of driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor, cannabis, or any drug if the person drives a vehicle within this state:(a) And the person has, within two hours after driving, an alcohol concentration of ((0.08))0.05 or higher as shown by analysis of the person's breath or blood made under RCW 46.61.506; or(b) The person has, within two hours after driving, a THC concentration of 5.00 or higher as shown by analysis of the person's blood made under RCW 46.61.506; or(c) While the person is under the influence of or affected by intoxicating liquor, cannabis, or any drug; or(d) While the person is under the combined influence of or affected by intoxicating liquor, cannabis, and any drug.(2) The fact that a person charged with a violation of this section is or has been entitled to use a drug under the laws of this state shall not constitute a defense against a charge of violating this section.(3)(a) It is an affirmative defense to a violation of subsection (1)(a) of this section, which the defendant must prove by a preponderance of the evidence, that the defendant consumed a sufficient quantity of alcohol after the time of driving and before the administration of an analysis of the person's breath or blood to cause the defendant's alcohol concentration to be ((0.08))0.05 or more within two hours after driving. The court shall not admit evidence of this defense unless the defendant notifies the prosecution prior to the omnibus or pretrial hearing in the case of the defendant's intent to assert the affirmative defense.(b) It is an affirmative defense to a violation of subsection (1)(b) of this section, which the defendant must prove by a preponderance of the evidence, that the defendant consumed a sufficient quantity of cannabis after the time of driving and before the administration of an analysis of the person's blood to cause the defendant's THC concentration to be 5.00 or more within two hours after driving. The court shall not admit evidence of this defense unless the defendant notifies the prosecution prior to the omnibus or pretrial hearing in the case of the defendant's intent to assert the affirmative defense.(4)(a) Analyses of blood or breath samples obtained more than two hours after the alleged driving may be used as evidence that within two hours of the alleged driving, a person had an alcohol concentration of ((0.08))0.05 or more in violation of subsection (1)(a) of this section, and in any case in which the analysis shows an alcohol concentration above 0.00 may be used as evidence that a person was under the influence of or affected by intoxicating liquor or any drug in violation of subsection (1)(c) or (d) of this section.(b) Analyses of blood samples obtained more than two hours after the alleged driving may be used as evidence that within two hours of the alleged driving, a person had a THC concentration of 5.00 or more in violation of subsection (1)(b) of this section, and in any case in which the analysis shows a THC concentration above 0.00 may be used as evidence that a person was under the influence of or affected by cannabis in violation of subsection (1)(c) or (d) of this section.(5) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, a violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor.(6) It is a class B felony punishable under chapter 9.94A RCW, or chapter 13.40 RCW if the person is a juvenile, if:(a) The person has three or more prior offenses within 15 years as defined in RCW 46.61.5055; or(b) The person has ever previously been convicted of:(i) Vehicular homicide while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW 46.61.520(1)(a);(ii) Vehicular assault while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW 46.61.522(1)(b);(iii) An out-of-state offense comparable to the offense specified in (b)(i) or (ii) of this subsection; or(iv) A violation of this subsection (6) or RCW 46.61.504(6).Sec. 2. RCW 46.61.503 and 2022 c 16 s 41 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this title, a person is guilty of driving or being in physical control of a motor vehicle after consuming alcohol or cannabis if the person operates or is in physical control of a motor vehicle within this state and the person:(a) Is under the age of ((twenty-one))21; and(b) Has, within two hours after operating or being in physical control of the motor vehicle, either:(i) An alcohol concentration of at least 0.02 but less than the concentration specified in RCW 46.61.502, as shown by analysis of the person's breath or blood made under RCW 46.61.506; or(ii) A THC concentration above 0.00 but less than the concentration specified in RCW 46.61.502, as shown by analysis of the person's blood made under RCW 46.61.506.(2) It is an affirmative defense to a violation of subsection (1) of this section, which the defendant must prove by a preponderance of the evidence, that the defendant consumed a sufficient quantity of alcohol or cannabis after the time of driving or being in physical control and before the administration of an analysis of the person's breath or blood to cause the defendant's alcohol or THC concentration to be in violation of subsection (1) of this section within two hours after driving or being in physical control. The court shall not admit evidence of this defense unless the defendant notifies the prosecution prior to the earlier of: (a) Seven days prior to trial; or (b) the omnibus or pretrial hearing in the case of the defendant's intent to assert the affirmative defense.(3) No person may be convicted under this section for being in physical control of a motor vehicle and it is an affirmative defense to any action pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 to suspend, revoke, or deny the privilege to drive, if, prior to being pursued by a law enforcement officer, the person has moved the vehicle safely off the roadway.(4) Analyses of blood or breath samples obtained more than two hours after the alleged driving or being in physical control may be used as evidence that within two hours of the alleged driving or being in physical control, a person had an alcohol or THC concentration in violation of subsection (1) of this section.(5) A violation of this section is a misdemeanor. Upon conviction, the court shall order an expanded substance use disorder assessment and treatment, if deemed appropriate by the assessment.Sec. 3. RCW 46.61.504 and 2024 c 306 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A person is guilty of being in actual physical control of a motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug if the person has actual physical control of a vehicle within this state:(a) And the person has, within two hours after being in actual physical control of the vehicle, an alcohol concentration of ((0.08))0.05 or higher as shown by analysis of the person's breath or blood made under RCW 46.61.506; or(b) The person has, within two hours after being in actual physical control of a vehicle, a THC concentration of 5.00 or higher as shown by analysis of the person's blood made under RCW 46.61.506; or(c) While the person is under the influence of or affected by intoxicating liquor or any drug; or(d) While the person is under the combined influence of or affected by intoxicating liquor and any drug.(2) The fact that a person charged with a violation of this section is or has been entitled to use a drug under the laws of this state does not constitute a defense against any charge of violating this section. No person may be convicted under this section and it is an affirmative defense to any action pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 to suspend, revoke, or deny the privilege to drive if, prior to being pursued by a law enforcement officer, the person has moved the vehicle safely off the roadway.(3)(a) It is an affirmative defense to a violation of subsection (1)(a) of this section which the defendant must prove by a preponderance of the evidence that the defendant consumed a sufficient quantity of alcohol after the time of being in actual physical control of the vehicle and before the administration of an analysis of the person's breath or blood to cause the defendant's alcohol concentration to be ((0.08))0.05 or more within two hours after being in such control. The court shall not admit evidence of this defense unless the defendant notifies the prosecution prior to the omnibus or pretrial hearing in the case of the defendant's intent to assert the affirmative defense.(b) It is an affirmative defense to a violation of subsection (1)(b) of this section, which the defendant must prove by a preponderance of the evidence, that the defendant consumed a sufficient quantity of cannabis after the time of being in actual physical control of the vehicle and before the administration of an analysis of the person's blood to cause the defendant's THC concentration to be 5.00 or more within two hours after being in control of the vehicle. The court shall not admit evidence of this defense unless the defendant notifies the prosecution prior to the omnibus or pretrial hearing in the case of the defendant's intent to assert the affirmative defense.(4)(a) Analyses of blood or breath samples obtained more than two hours after the alleged being in actual physical control of a vehicle may be used as evidence that within two hours of the alleged being in such control, a person had an alcohol concentration of ((0.08))0.05 or more in violation of subsection (1)(a) of this section, and in any case in which the analysis shows an alcohol concentration above 0.00 may be used as evidence that a person was under the influence of or affected by intoxicating liquor or any drug in violation of subsection (1)(c) or (d) of this section.(b) Analyses of blood samples obtained more than two hours after the alleged being in actual physical control of a vehicle may be used as evidence that within two hours of the alleged being in control of the vehicle, a person had a THC concentration of 5.00 or more in violation of subsection (1)(b) of this section, and in any case in which the analysis shows a THC concentration above 0.00 may be used as evidence that a person was under the influence of or affected by cannabis in violation of subsection (1)(c) or (d) of this section.(5) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, a violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor.(6) It is a class C felony punishable under chapter 9.94A RCW, or chapter 13.40 RCW if the person is a juvenile, if:(a) The person has three or more prior offenses within 15 years as defined in RCW 46.61.5055; or(b) The person has ever previously been convicted of:(i) Vehicular homicide while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW 46.61.520(1)(a);(ii) Vehicular assault while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW 46.61.522(1)(b);(iii) An out-of-state offense comparable to the offense specified in (b)(i) or (ii) of this subsection; or(iv) A violation of this subsection (6) or RCW 46.61.502(6).Sec. 4. RCW 46.61.5055 and 2024 c 306 s 31 are each amended to read as follows:(1) No prior offenses in seven years. Except as provided in RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6), a person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 and who has no prior offense within seven years shall be punished as follows:(a) Penalty for alcohol concentration less than 0.15. In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or for whom for reasons other than the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol concentration:(i) By imprisonment for not less than 24 consecutive hours nor more than 364 days. In lieu of the mandatory minimum term of imprisonment required under this subsection (1)(a)(i), the court, in its discretion, may order not less than 15 days of electronic home monitoring or a 90-day period of 24/7 sobriety program monitoring. The court may consider the offender's pretrial 24/7 sobriety program monitoring as fulfilling a portion of posttrial sentencing. The offender shall pay the cost of electronic home monitoring. The county or municipality in which the penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the offender's electronic home monitoring device or other separate alcohol monitoring device to include an alcohol detection breathalyzer, and the court may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time the offender is on electronic home monitoring; and(ii) By a fine of not less than $350 nor more than $5,000. $350 of the fine may not be suspended unless the court finds the offender to be indigent; or(b) Penalty for alcohol concentration at least 0.15. In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was at least 0.15, or for whom by reason of the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol concentration:(i) By imprisonment for not less than 48 consecutive hours nor more than 364 days. In lieu of the mandatory minimum term of imprisonment required under this subsection (1)(b)(i), the court, in its discretion, may order not less than 30 days of electronic home monitoring or a 120-day period of 24/7 sobriety program monitoring. The court may consider the offender's pretrial 24/7 sobriety program testing as fulfilling a portion of posttrial sentencing. The offender shall pay the cost of electronic home monitoring. The county or municipality in which the penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the offender's electronic home monitoring device to include an alcohol detection breathalyzer or other separate alcohol monitoring device, and the court may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time the offender is on electronic home monitoring; and(ii) By a fine of not less than $500 nor more than $5,000. $500 of the fine may not be suspended unless the court finds the offender to be indigent.(2) One prior offense in seven years. Except as provided in RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6), a person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 and who has one prior offense within seven years shall be punished as follows:(a) Penalty for alcohol concentration less than 0.15. In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or for whom for reasons other than the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol concentration:(i) By imprisonment for not less than 30 days nor more than 364 days and 60 days of electronic home monitoring. ((Thirty days of imprisonment and 60 days of electronic home monitoring may not be suspended or converted unless the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being. If the offender shows that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being, in))In lieu of the mandatory term of imprisonment and electronic home monitoring under this subsection (2)(a)(i), the court may order a minimum of four days in jail and either 180 days of electronic home monitoring or a 120-day period of 24/7 sobriety program monitoring pursuant to RCW 36.28A.300 through 36.28A.390. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or converted, the court shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension or conversion and the facts upon which the suspension or conversion is based. The court may consider the offender's pretrial 24/7 sobriety program monitoring as fulfilling a portion of posttrial sentencing. The court shall order an expanded substance use disorder assessment and treatment, if deemed appropriate by the assessment. The offender shall pay for the cost of the electronic monitoring. The county or municipality where the penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the offender's electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol detection breathalyzer or other separate alcohol monitoring device, and may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time the offender is on electronic home monitoring; and(ii) By a fine of not less than $500 nor more than $5,000. $500 of the fine may not be suspended unless the court finds the offender to be indigent; or(b) Penalty for alcohol concentration at least 0.15. In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was at least 0.15, or for whom by reason of the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol concentration:(i) By imprisonment for not less than 45 days nor more than 364 days and 90 days of electronic home monitoring. ((Forty-five days of imprisonment and 90 days of electronic home monitoring may not be suspended or converted unless the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being. If the offender shows that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being, in))In lieu of the mandatory minimum term of imprisonment and electronic home monitoring under this subsection (2)(b)(i), the court may order a minimum of six days in jail and either six months of electronic home monitoring or a 120-day period of 24/7 sobriety program monitoring pursuant to RCW 36.28A.300 through 36.28A.390. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or converted, the court shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension or conversion and the facts upon which the suspension or conversion is based. The court may consider the offender's pretrial 24/7 sobriety program monitoring as fulfilling a portion of posttrial sentencing. The court shall order an expanded substance use disorder assessment and treatment, if deemed appropriate by the assessment. The offender shall pay for the cost of the electronic monitoring. The county or municipality where the penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the offender's electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol detection breathalyzer or other separate alcohol monitoring device, and may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time the offender is on electronic home monitoring; and(ii) By a fine of not less than $750 nor more than $5,000. $750 of the fine may not be suspended unless the court finds the offender to be indigent.(3) Two prior offenses in seven years. Except as provided in RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6), a person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 and who has two prior offenses within seven years shall be punished as follows:(a) Penalty for alcohol concentration less than 0.15. In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or for whom for reasons other than the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol concentration:(i) By imprisonment for not less than 90 days nor more than 364 days, if available in that county or city, a six-month period of 24/7 sobriety program monitoring pursuant to RCW 36.28A.300 through 36.28A.390, and 120 days of electronic home monitoring. Ninety days of imprisonment and 120 days of electronic home monitoring may not be suspended or converted unless the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being. If the offender shows that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being, in lieu of the mandatory minimum term of 90 days of imprisonment and 120 days of electronic home monitoring, the court may order 360 days of electronic home monitoring or a 360-day period of 24/7 sobriety monitoring pursuant to RCW 36.28A.300 through 36.28A.390. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or converted, the court shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension or conversion and the facts upon which the suspension or conversion is based. The court shall order an expanded substance use disorder assessment and treatment, if deemed appropriate by the assessment. The offender shall pay for the cost of the electronic monitoring. The county or municipality where the penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the offender's electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol detection breathalyzer or other separate alcohol monitoring device, and may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time the offender is on electronic home monitoring; and(ii) By a fine of not less than $1,000 nor more than $5,000. $1,000 of the fine may not be suspended unless the court finds the offender to be indigent; or(b) Penalty for alcohol concentration at least 0.15. In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was at least 0.15, or for whom by reason of the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol concentration:(i) By imprisonment for not less than 120 days nor more than 364 days, if available in that county or city, a six-month period of 24/7 sobriety program monitoring pursuant to RCW 36.28A.300 through 36.28A.390, and 150 days of electronic home monitoring. One hundred twenty days of imprisonment and 150 days of electronic home monitoring may not be suspended or converted unless the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being. If the offender shows that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being, in lieu of the mandatory minimum term of 120 days of imprisonment and 150 days of electronic home monitoring, the court may order 360 days of electronic home monitoring or a 360-day period of 24/7 sobriety monitoring pursuant to RCW 36.28A.300 through 36.28A.390. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or converted, the court shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension or conversion and the facts upon which the suspension or conversion is based. The offender shall pay for the cost of the electronic monitoring. The court shall order an expanded substance use disorder assessment and treatment, if deemed appropriate by the assessment. The county or municipality where the penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the offender's electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol detection breathalyzer or other separate alcohol monitoring device, and may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time the offender is on electronic home monitoring; and(ii) By a fine of not less than $1,500 nor more than $5,000. $1,500 ((dollars)) of the fine may not be suspended unless the court finds the offender to be indigent.(4) Three or more prior offenses in 15 years. A person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 shall be punished under chapter 9.94A RCW if:(a) The person has three or more prior offenses within 15 years; or(b) The person has ever previously been convicted of:(i) A violation of RCW 46.61.520 committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;(ii) A violation of RCW 46.61.522 committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;(iii) An out-of-state offense comparable to the offense specified in (b)(i) or (ii) of this subsection; or(iv) A violation of RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6).(5) Monitoring. (a) Ignition interlock device. The court shall require any person convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or an equivalent local ordinance to comply with the rules and requirements of the department regarding the installation and use of a functioning ignition interlock device installed on all motor vehicles operated by the person.(b) Monitoring devices. If the court orders that a person refrain from consuming any alcohol, the court may order the person to submit to alcohol monitoring through an alcohol detection breathalyzer device, transdermal sensor device, or other technology designed to detect alcohol in a person's system. The person shall pay for the cost of the monitoring, unless the court specifies that the cost of monitoring will be paid with funds that are available from an alternative source identified by the court. The county or municipality where the penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost.(c) 24/7 sobriety program monitoring. In any county or city where a 24/7 sobriety program is available and verified by the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, the court shall:(i) Order the person to install and use a functioning ignition interlock or other device in lieu of such period of 24/7 sobriety program monitoring;(ii) Order the person to a period of 24/7 sobriety program monitoring pursuant to subsections (1) through (3) of this section; or(iii) Order the person to install and use a functioning ignition interlock or other device in addition to a period of 24/7 sobriety program monitoring pursuant to subsections (1) through (3) of this section.(6) Penalty for having a minor passenger in vehicle. If a person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 committed the offense while one or more passengers under the age of 16 were in the vehicle, the court shall:(a) Order the use of an ignition interlock or other device for an additional 12 months for each passenger under the age of 16 when the person is subject to the penalties under subsection (1)(a), (2)(a), or (3)(a) of this section; and order the use of an ignition interlock device for an additional 18 months for each passenger under the age of 16 when the person is subject to the penalties under subsection (1)(b), (2)(b), (3)(b), or (4) of this section;(b) In any case in which the person has no prior offenses within seven years, and except as provided in RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6), order an additional 24 hours of imprisonment to be served consecutively for each passenger under the age of 16, and a fine of not less than $1,000 and not more than $5,000 for each passenger under the age of 16. $1,000 of the fine for each passenger under the age of 16 may not be suspended unless the court finds the offender to be indigent;(c) In any case in which the person has one prior offense within seven years, and except as provided in RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6), order an additional five days of imprisonment to be served consecutively for each passenger under the age of 16, and a fine of not less than $2,000 and not more than $5,000 for each passenger under the age of 16. One thousand dollars of the fine for each passenger under the age of 16 may not be suspended unless the court finds the offender to be indigent;(d) In any case in which the person has two prior offenses within seven years, and except as provided in RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6), order an additional ten days of imprisonment to be served consecutively for each passenger under the age of 16, and a fine of not less than $3,000 and not more than $10,000 for each passenger under the age of 16. $1,000 of the fine for each passenger under the age of 16 may not be suspended unless the court finds the offender to be indigent.(7) Other items courts must consider while setting penalties. In exercising its discretion in setting penalties within the limits allowed by this section, the court shall particularly consider the following:(a) Whether the person's driving at the time of the offense was responsible for injury or damage to another or another's property;(b) Whether at the time of the offense the person was driving or in physical control of a vehicle with one or more passengers;(c) Whether the driver was driving in the opposite direction of the normal flow of traffic on a multiple lane highway, as defined by RCW 46.04.350, with a posted speed limit of 45 miles per hour or greater; and(d) Whether a child passenger under the age of 16 was an occupant in the driver's vehicle.(8) Treatment and information school. An offender punishable under this section is subject to the substance use disorder assessment and treatment provisions of RCW 46.61.5056.(9) Driver's license privileges of the defendant. (a) The license, permit, or nonresident privilege of a person convicted of driving or being in physical control of a motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs must:(i) Penalty for alcohol concentration less than 0.15. If the person's alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or if for reasons other than the person's refusal to take a test offered under RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol concentration:(A) Where there has been no prior offense within seven years, be suspended or denied by the department for 90 days or until the person is evaluated by a substance use disorder agency or probation department pursuant to RCW 46.20.311 and the person completes or is enrolled in a 90-day period of 24/7 sobriety program monitoring. In no circumstances shall the license suspension be for fewer than two days;(B) Where there has been one prior offense within seven years, be revoked or denied by the department for two years or until the person is evaluated by a substance use disorder agency or probation department pursuant to RCW 46.20.311 and the person completes or is enrolled in a six-month period of 24/7 sobriety program monitoring. In no circumstances shall the license suspension be for less than one year; or(C) Where there have been two or more prior offenses within seven years, be revoked or denied by the department for three years;(ii) Penalty for alcohol concentration at least 0.15. If the person's alcohol concentration was at least 0.15:(A) Where there has been no prior offense within seven years, be revoked or denied by the department for one year or until the person is evaluated by a substance use disorder agency or probation department pursuant to RCW 46.20.311 and the person completes or is enrolled in a one hundred twenty day period of 24/7 sobriety program monitoring. In no circumstances shall the license revocation be for fewer than four days;(B) Where there has been one prior offense within seven years, be revoked or denied by the department for 900 days; or(C) Where there have been two or more prior offenses within seven years, be revoked or denied by the department for four years; or(iii) Penalty for refusing to take test. If by reason of the person's refusal to take a test offered under RCW 46.20.308, there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol concentration:(A) Where there have been no prior offenses within seven years, be revoked or denied by the department for two years;(B) Where there has been one prior offense within seven years, be revoked or denied by the department for three years; or(C) Where there have been two or more previous offenses within seven years, be revoked or denied by the department for four years.(b)(i) The department shall grant credit on a day-for-day basis for a suspension, revocation, or denial imposed under this subsection (9) for any portion of a suspension, revocation, or denial already served under RCW 46.20.3101 arising out of the same incident.(ii) If a person has already served a suspension, revocation, or denial under RCW 46.20.3101 for a period equal to or greater than the period imposed under this subsection (9), the department shall provide notice of full credit, shall provide for no further suspension or revocation under this subsection provided the person has completed the requirements under RCW 46.20.311 and paid the probationary license fee under RCW 46.20.355 by the date specified in the notice under RCW 46.20.245, and shall impose no additional reissue fees for this credit.(c) Upon receipt of a notice from the court under RCW 36.28A.390 that a participant has been removed from a 24/7 sobriety program, the department must resume any suspension, revocation, or denial that had been terminated early under this subsection due to participation in the program, granting credit on a day-for-day basis for any portion of a suspension, revocation, or denial already served under RCW 46.20.3101 or this section arising out of the same incident.(d) Upon its own motion or upon motion by a person, a court may find, on the record, that notice to the department under RCW 46.20.270 has been delayed for three years or more as a result of a clerical or court error. If so, the court may order that the person's license, permit, or nonresident privilege shall not be revoked, suspended, or denied for that offense. The court shall send notice of the finding and order to the department and to the person. Upon receipt of the notice from the court, the department shall not revoke, suspend, or deny the license, permit, or nonresident privilege of the person for that offense.(e) For purposes of this subsection (9), the department shall refer to the driver's record maintained under RCW 46.52.120 when determining the existence of prior offenses.(10) Probation of driving privilege. After expiration of any period of suspension, revocation, or denial of the offender's license, permit, or privilege to drive required by this section, the department shall place the offender's driving privilege in probationary status pursuant to RCW 46.20.355.(11) Conditions of probation. (a) In addition to any nonsuspendable and nondeferrable jail sentence required by this section, whenever the court imposes up to 364 days in jail, the court shall also suspend but shall not defer a period of confinement for a period not exceeding five years. The court shall impose conditions of probation that include: (i) Not driving a motor vehicle within this state without a valid license to drive; (ii) not driving a motor vehicle within this state without proof of liability insurance or other financial responsibility for the future pursuant to RCW 46.30.020; (iii) not driving or being in physical control of a motor vehicle within this state while having an alcohol concentration of ((0.08))0.05 or more or a THC concentration of 5.00 nanograms per milliliter of whole blood or higher, within two hours after driving; (iv) not refusing to submit to a test of his or her breath or blood to determine alcohol or drug concentration upon request of a law enforcement officer who has reasonable grounds to believe the person was driving or was in actual physical control of a motor vehicle within this state while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drug; and (v) not driving a motor vehicle in this state without a functioning ignition interlock device as required by the department under RCW 46.20.720. The court may impose conditions of probation that include nonrepetition, installation of an ignition interlock device on the probationer's motor vehicle, substance use disorder treatment, supervised probation, or other conditions that may be appropriate. The sentence may be imposed in whole or in part upon violation of a condition of probation during the suspension period.(b) For each violation of mandatory conditions of probation under (a)(i), (ii), (iii), (iv), or (v) of this subsection, the court shall order the convicted person to be confined for 30 days, which shall not be suspended or deferred.(c)(i) Except as provided in (c)(ii) of this subsection, for each incident involving a violation of a mandatory condition of probation imposed under this subsection, the license, permit, or privilege to drive of the person shall be suspended by the court for 30 days or, if such license, permit, or privilege to drive already is suspended, revoked, or denied at the time the finding of probation violation is made, the suspension, revocation, or denial then in effect shall be extended by 30 days. The court shall notify the department of any suspension, revocation, or denial or any extension of a suspension, revocation, or denial imposed under this subsection. The person may apply for an ignition interlock driver's license under RCW 46.20.385 during the suspension period.(ii) For each incident involving a violation of RCW 46.20.342(1)(c), the court has discretion not to impose a suspension when the person provides the court with proof that the violation has been cured within 30 days. The court is not required to notify the department of the violation unless it is not cured within 30 days.(12) Waiver of electronic home monitoring. A court may waive the electronic home monitoring requirements of this chapter when:(a) The offender does not have a dwelling, telephone service, or any other necessity to operate an electronic home monitoring system. However, if a court determines that an alcohol monitoring device utilizing wireless reporting technology is reasonably available, the court may require the person to obtain such a device during the period of required electronic home monitoring;(b) The offender does not reside in the state of Washington; or(c) The court determines that there is reason to believe that the offender would violate the conditions of the electronic home monitoring penalty.Whenever the mandatory minimum term of electronic home monitoring is waived, the court shall state in writing the reason for granting the waiver and the facts upon which the waiver is based, and shall impose an alternative sentence with similar punitive consequences. The alternative sentence may include, but is not limited to, use of an ignition interlock device, the 24/7 sobriety program monitoring, additional jail time, work crew, or work camp.Whenever the combination of jail time and electronic home monitoring or alternative sentence would exceed 364 days, the offender shall serve the jail portion of the sentence first, and the electronic home monitoring or alternative portion of the sentence shall be reduced so that the combination does not exceed 364 days.(13) Extraordinary medical placement. An offender serving a sentence under this section, whether or not a mandatory minimum term has expired, may be granted an extraordinary medical placement by the jail administrator subject to the standards and limitations set forth in RCW 9.94A.728(1)(c).(14) Definitions. For purposes of this section and RCW 46.61.502 and 46.61.504:(a) A "prior offense" means any of the following:(i) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or an equivalent local ordinance;(ii) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.504 or an equivalent local ordinance;(iii) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.25.110 or an equivalent local ordinance;(iv) A conviction for a violation of RCW 79A.60.040(2) or an equivalent local ordinance;(v) A conviction for a violation of RCW 79A.60.040(1) or an equivalent local ordinance committed in a reckless manner if the conviction is the result of a charge that was originally filed as a violation of RCW 79A.60.040(2) or an equivalent local ordinance;(vi) A conviction for a violation of RCW 47.68.220 or an equivalent local ordinance committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;(vii) A conviction for a violation of RCW 47.68.220 or an equivalent local ordinance committed in a careless or reckless manner if the conviction is the result of a charge that was originally filed as a violation of RCW 47.68.220 or an equivalent local ordinance while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;(viii) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.09.470(2) or an equivalent local ordinance;(ix) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.10.490(2) or an equivalent local ordinance;(x) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.520 committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, or a conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.520 committed in a reckless manner or with the disregard for the safety of others if the conviction is the result of a charge that was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.520 committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;(xi) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.522 committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, or a conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.522 committed in a reckless manner or with the disregard for the safety of others if the conviction is the result of a charge that was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.522 committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;(xii) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.5249, 46.61.500, or 9A.36.050 or an equivalent local ordinance, if the conviction is the result of a charge that was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance, or of RCW 46.61.520 or 46.61.522;(xiii) An out-of-state conviction for a violation that would have been a violation of (a)(i), (ii), (x), (xi), or (xii) of this subsection if committed in this state;(xiv) A deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW granted in a prosecution for a violation of RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance;(xv) A deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW granted in a prosecution for a violation of RCW 46.61.5249, or an equivalent local ordinance, if the charge under which the deferred prosecution was granted was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance, or of RCW 46.61.520 or 46.61.522;(xvi) A deferred prosecution granted in another state for a violation of driving or having physical control of a vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug if the out-of-state deferred prosecution is equivalent to the deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW, including a requirement that the defendant participate in a chemical dependency treatment program; or(xvii) A deferred sentence imposed in a prosecution for a violation of RCW 46.61.5249, 46.61.500, or 9A.36.050, or an equivalent local ordinance, if the charge under which the deferred sentence was imposed was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance, or a violation of RCW 46.61.520 or 46.61.522;If a deferred prosecution is revoked based on a subsequent conviction for an offense listed in this subsection (14)(a), the subsequent conviction shall not be treated as a prior offense of the revoked deferred prosecution for the purposes of sentencing;(b) "Treatment" means substance use disorder treatment licensed or certified by the department of health;(c) "Within seven years" means that the arrest for a prior offense occurred within seven years before or after the arrest for the current offense; and(d) "Within 15 years" means that the arrest for a prior offense occurred within 15 years before or after the arrest for the current offense.(15) All fines imposed by this section apply to adult offenders only.Sec. 5. RCW 46.61.506 and 2020 c 80 s 33 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Upon the trial of any civil or criminal action or proceeding arising out of acts alleged to have been committed by any person while driving or in actual physical control of a vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, if the person's alcohol concentration is less than ((0.08))0.05 or the person's THC concentration is less than 5.00, it is evidence that may be considered with other competent evidence in determining whether the person was under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug.(2)(a) The breath analysis of the person's alcohol concentration shall be based upon grams of alcohol per ((two hundred ten))210 liters of breath.(b) The blood analysis of the person's THC concentration shall be based upon nanograms per milliliter of whole blood.(c) The foregoing provisions of this section shall not be construed as limiting the introduction of any other competent evidence bearing upon the question whether the person was under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug.(3) Analysis of the person's blood or breath to be considered valid under the provisions of this section or RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 shall have been performed according to methods approved by the state toxicologist and by an individual possessing a valid permit issued by the state toxicologist for this purpose. The state toxicologist is directed to approve satisfactory techniques or methods, to supervise the examination of individuals to ascertain their qualifications and competence to conduct such analyses, and to issue permits which shall be subject to termination or revocation at the discretion of the state toxicologist.(4)(a) A breath test performed by any instrument approved by the state toxicologist shall be admissible at trial or in an administrative proceeding if the prosecution or department produces prima facie evidence of the following:(i) The person who performed the test was authorized to perform such test by the state toxicologist;(ii) The person being tested did not vomit or have anything to eat, drink, or smoke for at least ((fifteen))15 minutes prior to administration of the test;(iii) The person being tested did not have any foreign substances, not to include dental work or piercings, fixed or removable, in his or her mouth at the beginning of the ((fifteen-minute))15-minute observation period;(iv) Prior to the start of the test, the temperature of any liquid simulator solution utilized as an external standard, as measured by a thermometer approved of by the state toxicologist was ((thirty-four))34 degrees centigrade plus or minus 0.3 degrees centigrade;(v) The internal standard test resulted in the message "verified";(vi) The two breath samples agree to within plus or minus ((ten))10 percent of their mean to be determined by the method approved by the state toxicologist;(vii) The result of the test of the liquid simulator solution external standard or dry gas external standard result did lie between ((.072 to .088)).045 to .055 inclusive; and(viii) All blank tests gave results of .000.(b) For purposes of this section, "prima facie evidence" is evidence of sufficient circumstances that would support a logical and reasonable inference of the facts sought to be proved. In assessing whether there is sufficient evidence of the foundational facts, the court or administrative tribunal is to assume the truth of the prosecution's or department's evidence and all reasonable inferences from it in a light most favorable to the prosecution or department.(c) Nothing in this section shall be deemed to prevent the subject of the test from challenging the reliability or accuracy of the test, the reliability or functioning of the instrument, or any maintenance procedures. Such challenges, however, shall not preclude the admissibility of the test once the prosecution or department has made a prima facie showing of the requirements contained in (a) of this subsection. Instead, such challenges may be considered by the trier of fact in determining what weight to give to the test result.(5) When a blood test is administered under the provisions of RCW 46.20.308, the withdrawal of blood for the purpose of determining its alcohol or drug content may be performed only by a physician licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW; an osteopathic physician licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW; a registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, or advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW; a physician assistant licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW; an advanced emergency medical technician or paramedic certified under chapter 18.71 RCW; or a medical assistant-certified or medical assistant-phlebotomist certified under chapter 18.360 RCW, a person holding another credential under Title 18 RCW whose scope of practice includes performing venous blood draws, or a forensic phlebotomist certified under chapter 18.360 RCW. When the blood test is performed outside the state of Washington, the withdrawal of blood for the purpose of determining its alcohol or drug content may be performed by any person who is authorized by the out-of-state jurisdiction to perform venous blood draws. Proof of qualification to draw blood may be established through the department of health's provider credential search. This limitation shall not apply to the taking of breath specimens.(6) When a venous blood sample is performed by a forensic phlebotomist certified under chapter 18.360 RCW, it must be done under the following conditions:(a) If taken at the scene, it must be performed in an ambulance or aid service vehicle licensed by the department of health under chapter 18.73 RCW.(b) The collection of blood samples must not interfere with the provision of essential medical care.(c) The blood sample must be collected using sterile equipment and the skin area of puncture must be thoroughly cleansed and disinfected.(d) The person whose blood is collected must be seated, reclined, or lying down when the blood is collected.(7) The person tested may have a licensed or certified health care provider listed in subsection (5) of this section, or a qualified technician, chemist, or other qualified person of his or her own choosing administer one or more tests in addition to any administered at the direction of a law enforcement officer. The test will be admissible if the person establishes the general acceptability of the testing technique or method. The failure or inability to obtain an additional test by a person shall not preclude the admission of evidence relating to the test or tests taken at the direction of a law enforcement officer.(8) Upon the request of the person who shall submit to a test or tests at the request of a law enforcement officer, full information concerning the test or tests shall be made available to him or her or his or her attorney.Sec. 6. RCW 46.20.308 and 2022 c 16 s 38 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Any person who operates a motor vehicle within this state is deemed to have given consent, subject to the provisions of RCW 46.61.506, to a test or tests of his or her breath for the purpose of determining the alcohol concentration in his or her breath if arrested for any offense where, at the time of the arrest, the arresting officer has reasonable grounds to believe the person had been driving or was in actual physical control of a motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug or was in violation of RCW 46.61.503.(2) The test or tests of breath shall be administered at the direction of a law enforcement officer having reasonable grounds to believe the person to have been driving or in actual physical control of a motor vehicle within this state while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug or the person to have been driving or in actual physical control of a motor vehicle while having alcohol in a concentration in violation of RCW 46.61.503 in his or her system and being under the age of ((twenty-one))21. Prior to administering a breath test pursuant to this section, the officer shall inform the person of his or her right under this section to refuse the breath test, and of his or her right to have additional tests administered by any qualified person of his or her choosing as provided in RCW 46.61.506. The officer shall warn the driver, in substantially the following language, that:(a) If the driver refuses to take the test, the driver's license, permit, or privilege to drive will be revoked or denied for at least one year; and(b) If the driver refuses to take the test, the driver's refusal to take the test may be used in a criminal trial; and(c) If the driver submits to the test and the test is administered, the driver's license, permit, or privilege to drive will be suspended, revoked, or denied for at least ((ninety))90 days if:(i) The driver is age ((twenty-one))21 or over and the test indicates either that the alcohol concentration of the driver's breath is ((0.08))0.05 or more; or(ii) The driver is under age ((twenty-one))21 and the test indicates either that the alcohol concentration of the driver's breath is 0.02 or more; or(iii) The driver is under age ((twenty-one))21 and the driver is in violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504; and(d) If the driver's license, permit, or privilege to drive is suspended, revoked, or denied the driver may be eligible to immediately apply for an ignition interlock driver's license.(3) If, following his or her arrest and receipt of warnings under subsection (2) of this section, the person arrested exercises the right, granted herein, by refusing upon the request of a law enforcement officer to submit to a test or tests of his or her breath, no test shall be given except as otherwise authorized by law.(4) Nothing in subsection (1), (2), or (3) of this section precludes a law enforcement officer from obtaining a person's blood to test for alcohol, cannabis, or any drug, pursuant to a search warrant, a valid waiver of the warrant requirement, when exigent circumstances exist, or under any other authority of law. Any blood drawn for the purpose of determining the person's alcohol, cannabis levels, or any drug, is drawn pursuant to this section when the officer has reasonable grounds to believe that the person is in physical control or driving a vehicle under the influence or in violation of RCW 46.61.503.(5) If, after arrest and after any other applicable conditions and requirements of this section have been satisfied, a test or tests of the person's blood or breath is administered and the test results indicate that the alcohol concentration of the person's breath or blood is ((0.08))0.05 or more, or the THC concentration of the person's blood is 5.00 or more, if the person is age ((twenty-one))21 or over, or that the alcohol concentration of the person's breath or blood is 0.02 or more, or the THC concentration of the person's blood is above 0.00, if the person is under the age of ((twenty-one))21, or the person refuses to submit to a test, the arresting officer or other law enforcement officer at whose direction any test has been given, or the department, where applicable, if the arrest results in a test of the person's blood, shall:(a) Serve notice in writing on the person on behalf of the department of its intention to suspend, revoke, or deny the person's license, permit, or privilege to drive as required by subsection (6) of this section;(b) Serve notice in writing on the person on behalf of the department of his or her right to a hearing, specifying the steps he or she must take to obtain a hearing as provided by subsection (7) of this section;(c) Serve notice in writing that the license or permit, if any, is a temporary license that is valid for ((thirty))30 days from the date of arrest or from the date notice has been given in the event notice is given by the department following a blood test, or until the suspension, revocation, or denial of the person's license, permit, or privilege to drive is sustained at a hearing pursuant to subsection (7) of this section, whichever occurs first. No temporary license is valid to any greater degree than the license or permit that it replaces; and(d) Immediately notify the department of the arrest and transmit to the department within ((seventy-two))72 hours, except as delayed as the result of a blood test, a sworn report or report under a declaration authorized by chapter 5.50 RCW that states:(i) That the officer had reasonable grounds to believe the arrested person had been driving or was in actual physical control of a motor vehicle within this state while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs, or both, or was under the age of ((twenty-one))21 years and had been driving or was in actual physical control of a motor vehicle while having an alcohol or THC concentration in violation of RCW 46.61.503;(ii) That after receipt of any applicable warnings required by subsection (2) of this section the person refused to submit to a test of his or her breath, or a test was administered and the results indicated that the alcohol concentration of the person's breath or blood was ((0.08))0.05 or more, or the THC concentration of the person's blood was 5.00 or more, if the person is age ((twenty-one))21 or over, or that the alcohol concentration of the person's breath or blood was 0.02 or more, or the THC concentration of the person's blood was above 0.00, if the person is under the age of ((twenty-one))21; and(iii) Any other information that the director may require by rule.(6) The department of licensing, upon the receipt of a sworn report or report under a declaration authorized by chapter 5.50 RCW under subsection (5)(d) of this section, shall suspend, revoke, or deny the person's license, permit, or privilege to drive or any nonresident operating privilege, as provided in RCW 46.20.3101, such suspension, revocation, or denial to be effective beginning thirty days from the date of arrest or from the date notice has been given in the event notice is given by the department following a blood test, or when sustained at a hearing pursuant to subsection (7) of this section, whichever occurs first.(7) A person receiving notification under subsection (5)(b) of this section may, within seven days after the notice has been given, request in writing a formal hearing before the department. The person shall pay a fee of ((three hundred seventy-five dollars))$375 as part of the request. If the request is mailed, it must be postmarked within seven days after receipt of the notification. Upon timely receipt of such a request for a formal hearing, including receipt of the required ((three hundred seventy-five dollar))$375 fee, the department shall afford the person an opportunity for a hearing. The department may waive the required ((three hundred seventy-five dollar))$375 fee if the person is an indigent as defined in RCW 10.101.010. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the hearing is subject to and shall be scheduled and conducted in accordance with RCW 46.20.329 and 46.20.332. The hearing shall be conducted in the county of the arrest, except that all or part of the hearing may, at the discretion of the department, be conducted by telephone or other electronic means. The hearing shall be held within ((thirty))30 days, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays, following the date of timely receipt of such request for a formal hearing before the department or ((thirty))30 days, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays following the date notice has been given in the event notice is given by the department following a blood test, unless otherwise agreed to by the department and the person, in which case the action by the department shall be stayed, and any valid temporary license under subsection (5) of this section extended, if the person is otherwise eligible for licensing. Unless otherwise agreed to by the department and the person, the department must give five days notice of the hearing to the person. For the purposes of this section, the scope of the hearing shall cover the issues of whether a law enforcement officer had reasonable grounds to believe the person had been driving or was in actual physical control of a motor vehicle within this state while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug or had been driving or was in actual physical control of a motor vehicle within this state while having alcohol in his or her system in a concentration of 0.02 or more, or THC in his or her system in a concentration above 0.00, if the person was under the age of ((twenty-one))21, whether the person was placed under arrest, and (a) whether the person refused to submit to the test or tests upon request of the officer after having been informed that such refusal would result in the revocation of the person's license, permit, or privilege to drive, or (b) if a test or tests were administered, whether the applicable requirements of this section were satisfied before the administration of the test or tests, whether the person submitted to the test or tests, or whether a test was administered pursuant to a search warrant, a valid waiver of the warrant requirement, when exigent circumstances exist, or under any other authority of law as permitted under this section, and whether the test or tests indicated that the alcohol concentration of the person's breath or blood was ((0.08))0.05 or more, or the THC concentration of the person's blood was 5.00 or more, if the person was age ((twenty-one))21 or over at the time of the arrest, or that the alcohol concentration of the person's breath or blood was 0.02 or more, or the THC concentration of the person's blood was above 0.00, if the person was under the age of ((twenty-one))21 at the time of the arrest. Where a person is found to be in actual physical control of a motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug or was under the age of ((twenty-one))21 at the time of the arrest and was in physical control of a motor vehicle while having alcohol in his or her system in a concentration of 0.02 or THC concentration above 0.00, the person may petition the hearing officer to apply the affirmative defense found in RCW 46.61.504(3) and 46.61.503(2). The driver has the burden to prove the affirmative defense by a preponderance of the evidence. The sworn report or report under a declaration authorized by chapter 5.50 RCW submitted by a law enforcement officer is prima facie evidence that the officer had reasonable grounds to believe the person had been driving or was in actual physical control of a motor vehicle within this state while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs, or both, or the person had been driving or was in actual physical control of a motor vehicle within this state while having alcohol in his or her system in a concentration of 0.02 or more, or THC in his or her system in a concentration above 0.00, and was under the age of ((twenty-one))21 and that the officer complied with the requirements of this section.A hearing officer shall conduct the hearing, may issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and the production of documents, and shall administer oaths to witnesses. The hearing officer shall not issue a subpoena for the attendance of a witness at the request of the person unless the request is accompanied by the fee required by RCW 5.56.010 for a witness in district court. No witness fee is required if the witness was a law enforcement officer who wrote a report submitted under this section. The sworn report or report under a declaration authorized by chapter 5.50 RCW of the law enforcement officer and any other evidence accompanying the report shall be admissible without further evidentiary foundation and the certifications authorized by the criminal rules for courts of limited jurisdiction shall be admissible without further evidentiary foundation. The person may be represented by counsel, may question witnesses, may present evidence, and may testify. The department shall order that the suspension, revocation, or denial either be rescinded or sustained.(8) If the suspension, revocation, or denial is sustained after such a hearing, the person whose license, privilege, or permit is suspended, revoked, or denied has the right to file a petition in the superior court of the county of arrest to review the final order of revocation by the department in the same manner as an appeal from a decision of a court of limited jurisdiction. Notice of appeal must be filed within ((thirty))30 days after the date the final order is served or the right to appeal is waived. Notwithstanding RCW 46.20.334, RALJ 1.1, or other statutes or rules referencing de novo review, the appeal shall be limited to a review of the record of the administrative hearing. The appellant must pay the costs associated with obtaining the record of the hearing before the hearing officer. The filing of the appeal does not stay the effective date of the suspension, revocation, or denial. A petition filed under this subsection must include the petitioner's grounds for requesting review. Upon granting petitioner's request for review, the court shall review the department's final order of suspension, revocation, or denial as expeditiously as possible. The review must be limited to a determination of whether the department has committed any errors of law. The superior court shall accept those factual determinations supported by substantial evidence in the record: (a) That were expressly made by the department; or (b) that may reasonably be inferred from the final order of the department. The superior court may reverse, affirm, or modify the decision of the department or remand the case back to the department for further proceedings. The decision of the superior court must be in writing and filed in the clerk's office with the other papers in the case. The court shall state the reasons for the decision. If judicial relief is sought for a stay or other temporary remedy from the department's action, the court shall not grant such relief unless the court finds that the appellant is likely to prevail in the appeal and that without a stay the appellant will suffer irreparable injury. If the court stays the suspension, revocation, or denial it may impose conditions on such stay.(9)(a) If a person whose driver's license, permit, or privilege to drive has been or will be suspended, revoked, or denied under subsection (6) of this section, other than as a result of a breath test refusal, and who has not committed an offense for which he or she was granted a deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW, petitions a court for a deferred prosecution on criminal charges arising out of the arrest for which action has been or will be taken under subsection (6) of this section, or notifies the department of licensing of the intent to seek such a deferred prosecution, then the license suspension or revocation shall be stayed pending entry of the deferred prosecution. The stay shall not be longer than ((one hundred fifty))150 days after the date charges are filed, or two years after the date of the arrest, whichever time period is shorter. If the court stays the suspension, revocation, or denial, it may impose conditions on such stay. If the person is otherwise eligible for licensing, the department shall issue a temporary license, or extend any valid temporary license under subsection (5) of this section, for the period of the stay. If a deferred prosecution treatment plan is not recommended in the report made under RCW 10.05.050, or if treatment is rejected by the court, or if the person declines to accept an offered treatment plan, or if the person violates any condition imposed by the court, then the court shall immediately direct the department to cancel the stay and any temporary license or extension of a temporary license issued under this subsection.(b) A suspension, revocation, or denial imposed under this section, other than as a result of a breath test refusal, shall be stayed if the person is accepted for deferred prosecution as provided in chapter 10.05 RCW for the incident upon which the suspension, revocation, or denial is based. If the deferred prosecution is terminated, the stay shall be lifted and the suspension, revocation, or denial reinstated. If the deferred prosecution is completed, the stay shall be lifted and the suspension, revocation, or denial canceled.(c) The provisions of (b) of this subsection relating to a stay of a suspension, revocation, or denial and the cancellation of any suspension, revocation, or denial do not apply to the suspension, revocation, denial, or disqualification of a person's commercial driver's license or privilege to operate a commercial motor vehicle.(10) When it has been finally determined under the procedures of this section that a nonresident's privilege to operate a motor vehicle in this state has been suspended, revoked, or denied, the department shall give information in writing of the action taken to the motor vehicle administrator of the state of the person's residence and of any state in which he or she has a license.Sec. 7. RCW 46.20.3101 and 2020 c 330 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:Pursuant to RCW 46.20.308, the department shall suspend, revoke, or deny the arrested person's license, permit, or privilege to drive as follows:(1) In the case of a person who has refused a test or tests:(a) For a first refusal within seven years, where there has not been a previous incident within seven years that resulted in administrative action under this section, revocation or denial for one year;(b) For a second or subsequent refusal within seven years, or for a first refusal where there has been one or more previous incidents within seven years that have resulted in administrative action under this section, revocation or denial for two years or until the person reaches age ((twenty-one))21, whichever is longer.(2) In the case of an incident where a person has submitted to or been administered a test or tests indicating that the alcohol concentration of the person's breath or blood was ((0.08))0.05 or more, or that the THC concentration of the person's blood was 5.00 or more:(a) For a first incident within seven years, where there has not been a previous incident within seven years that resulted in administrative action under this section, suspension for ((ninety))90 days, unless the person successfully completes or is enrolled in a pretrial 24/7 sobriety program;(b) For a second or subsequent incident within seven years, revocation or denial for two years.(3) In the case of an incident where a person under age ((twenty-one))21 has submitted to or been administered a test or tests indicating that the alcohol concentration of the person's breath or blood was 0.02 or more, or that the THC concentration of the person's blood was above 0.00:(a) For a first incident within seven years, suspension or denial for ((ninety))90 days;(b) For a second or subsequent incident within seven years, revocation or denial for one year or until the person reaches age ((twenty-one))21, whichever is longer.(4) The department shall grant credit on a day-for-day basis for a suspension, revocation, or denial imposed under this section for any portion of a suspension, revocation, or denial already served under RCW 46.61.5055 arising out of the same incident. If a person has already served a suspension, revocation, or denial under RCW 46.61.5055 for a period equal to or greater than the period imposed under this section, the department shall provide notice of full credit, shall provide for no further suspension or revocation under this section, and shall impose no additional reissue fees for this credit.Sec. 8. RCW 46.61.500 and 2020 c 330 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Any person who drives any vehicle in willful or wanton disregard for the safety of persons or property is guilty of reckless driving. Violation of the provisions of this section is a gross misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for up to ((three hundred sixty-four))364 days and by a fine of not more than ((five thousand dollars))$5,000.(2)(a) Subject to (b) of this subsection, the license or permit to drive or any nonresident privilege of any person convicted of reckless driving shall be suspended by the department for not less than ((thirty))30 days.(b) When a reckless driving conviction is a result of a charge that was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance, the department shall grant credit on a day-for-day basis for any portion of a suspension, revocation, or denial already served under an administrative action arising out of the same incident. In the case of a person whose day-for-day credit is for a period equal to or greater than the period of suspension required under this section, the department shall provide notice of full credit, shall provide for no further suspension under this section, and shall impose no additional reissue fees for this credit. During any period of suspension, revocation, or denial due to a conviction for reckless driving as the result of a charge originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, any person who has obtained an ignition interlock driver's license under RCW 46.20.385 may continue to drive a motor vehicle pursuant to the provision of the ignition interlock driver's license without obtaining a separate temporary restricted driver's license under RCW 46.20.391.(3)(a) Except as provided under (b) of this subsection, a person convicted of reckless driving who has one or more prior offenses as defined in RCW 46.61.5055(14) within seven years shall be required, under RCW 46.20.720, to install an ignition interlock device on all vehicles operated by the person if the conviction is the result of a charge that was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance.(b) A person convicted of reckless driving shall be required, under RCW 46.20.720, to install an ignition interlock device on all vehicles operated by the person if the conviction is the result of a charge that was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.520 committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug or RCW 46.61.522 committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug.(4) When a reckless driving conviction is a result of a charge that was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance, the court shall order an expanded substance use disorder assessment and treatment, if deemed appropriate by the assessment.Sec. 9. RCW 46.61.5249 and 2022 c 16 s 44 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) A person is guilty of negligent driving in the first degree if he or she operates a motor vehicle in a manner that is both negligent and endangers or is likely to endanger any person or property, and exhibits the effects of having consumed liquor or cannabis or any drug or exhibits the effects of having inhaled or ingested any chemical, whether or not a legal substance, for its intoxicating or hallucinatory effects.(b) It is an affirmative defense to negligent driving in the first degree by means of exhibiting the effects of having consumed any drug that must be proved by the defendant by a preponderance of the evidence, that the driver has a valid prescription for the drug consumed, and has been consuming it according to the prescription directions and warnings.(c) Negligent driving in the first degree is a misdemeanor.(2) For the purposes of this section:(a) "Negligent" means the failure to exercise ordinary care, and is the doing of some act that a reasonably careful person would not do under the same or similar circumstances or the failure to do something that a reasonably careful person would do under the same or similar circumstances.(b) "Exhibiting the effects of having consumed liquor, cannabis, or any drug" means that a person has the odor of liquor, cannabis, or any drug on his or her breath, or that by speech, manner, appearance, behavior, lack of coordination, or otherwise exhibits that he or she has consumed liquor, cannabis, or any drug, and either:(i) Is in possession of or in close proximity to a container that has or recently had liquor, cannabis, or any drug in it; or(ii) Is shown by other evidence to have recently consumed liquor, cannabis, or any drug.(c) "Exhibiting the effects of having inhaled or ingested any chemical, whether or not a legal substance, for its intoxicating or hallucinatory effects" means that a person by speech, manner, appearance, behavior, or lack of coordination or otherwise exhibits that he or she has inhaled or ingested a chemical and either:(i) Is in possession of the canister or container from which the chemical came; or(ii) Is shown by other evidence to have recently inhaled or ingested a chemical for its intoxicating or hallucinatory effects.(3) Any act prohibited by this section that also constitutes a crime under any other law of this state may be the basis of prosecution under such other law notwithstanding that it may also be the basis for prosecution under this section.(4) A person convicted of negligent driving in the first degree who has one or more prior offenses as defined in RCW 46.61.5055(14) within seven years shall be required, under RCW 46.20.720, to install an ignition interlock device on all vehicles operated by the person.(5) When a conviction for negligent driving in the first degree is a result of a charge that was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance, the court shall order an expanded substance use disorder assessment and treatment, if deemed appropriate by the assessment.Sec. 10. RCW 9A.04.080 and 2024 c 298 s 16 and 2024 c 297 s 11 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) Prosecutions for criminal offenses shall not be commenced after the periods prescribed in this section.(a) The following offenses may be prosecuted at any time after their commission:(i) Murder;(ii) Homicide by abuse;(iii) Arson if a death results;(iv) Vehicular homicide;(v) Vehicular assault if a death results;(vi) Hit-and-run injury-accident if a death results (RCW 46.52.020(4));(vii) Rape in the first degree (RCW 9A.44.040) if the victim is under the age of sixteen;(viii) Rape in the second degree (RCW 9A.44.050) if the victim is under the age of sixteen;(ix) Rape of a child in the first degree (RCW 9A.44.073);(x) Rape of a child in the second degree (RCW 9A.44.076);(xi) Rape of a child in the third degree (RCW 9A.44.079);(xii) Sexual misconduct with a minor in the first degree (RCW 9A.44.093);(xiii) Custodial sexual misconduct in the first degree (RCW 9A.44.160);(xiv) Child molestation in the first degree (RCW 9A.44.083);(xv) Child molestation in the second degree (RCW 9A.44.086);(xvi) Child molestation in the third degree (RCW 9A.44.089);(xvii) Sexual exploitation of a minor (RCW 9.68A.040);(xviii) Rape in the first degree (RCW 9A.44.040) if the perpetrator is a first responder as defined in RCW 70.54.430 and if the first responder used the first responder's position to facilitate the commission of the offense;(xix) Rape in the second degree (RCW 9A.44.050) if the perpetrator is a first responder as defined in RCW 70.54.430 and if the first responder used the first responder's position to facilitate the commission of the offense;(xx) Rape in the third degree (RCW 9A.44.060) if the perpetrator is a first responder as defined in RCW 70.54.430 and if the first responder used the first responder's position to facilitate the commission of the offense;(xxi) Trafficking (RCW 9A.40.100) if the victim is under the age of 18;(xxii) Commercial sexual abuse of a minor (RCW 9.68A.100);(xxiii) Promoting commercial sexual abuse of a minor (RCW 9.68A.101);(xxiv) Promoting travel for commercial sexual abuse of a minor (RCW 9.68A.102); and(xxv) Permitting commercial sexual abuse of a minor (RCW 9.68A.103).(b) Except as provided in (a) of this subsection, the following offenses may not be prosecuted more than 20 years after its commission:(i) Rape in the first degree (RCW 9A.44.040);(ii) Rape in the second degree (RCW 9A.44.050); or(iii) Indecent liberties (RCW 9A.44.100).(c) The following offenses may not be prosecuted more than ten years after its commission:(i) Any felony committed by a public officer if the commission is in connection with the duties of his or her office or constitutes a breach of his or her public duty or a violation of the oath of office;(ii) Arson if no death results;(iii) Rape in the third degree (RCW 9A.44.060);(iv) Attempted murder; or(v) Trafficking under RCW 9A.40.100.(d) A violation of this offense listed in this subsection (1)(d) may be prosecuted up to 10 years after its commission or, if committed against a victim under the age of 18, up to the victim's 30th birthday, whichever is later: RCW 9A.64.020 (incest).(e) A violation of RCW 9A.36.170 may be prosecuted up to 10 years after its commission, or if committed against a victim under the age of 18, up to the victim's 28th birthday, whichever is later.(f) The following offenses may not be prosecuted more than six years after its commission or discovery, whichever occurs later:(i) Violations of RCW 9A.82.060 or 9A.82.080;(ii) Any felony violation of chapter 9A.83 RCW;(iii) Any felony violation of chapter 9.35 RCW;(iv) Theft in the first or second degree under chapter 9A.56 RCW when accomplished by color or aid of deception;(v) Theft from a vulnerable adult under RCW 9A.56.400;(vi) Trafficking in stolen property in the first or second degree under chapter 9A.82 RCW in which the stolen property is a motor vehicle or major component part of a motor vehicle as defined in RCW 46.80.010; or(vii) Violations of RCW 82.32.290 (2)(a)(iii) or (4).(g) The following offenses may not be prosecuted more than five years after its commission: Any class C felony under chapter 74.09, 82.36, or 82.38 RCW.(h) Bigamy may not be prosecuted more than three years after the time specified in RCW 9A.64.010.(i) A violation of RCW 9A.56.030 may not be prosecuted more than three years after the discovery of the offense when the victim is a tax exempt corporation under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3).(j) No other felony may be prosecuted more than three years after its commission; except that in a prosecution under RCW 9A.44.115, if the person who was viewed, photographed, or filmed did not realize at the time that he or she was being viewed, photographed, or filmed, the prosecution must be commenced within two years of the time the person who was viewed or in the photograph or film first learns that he or she was viewed, photographed, or filmed.(k) No gross misdemeanor, except as provided under (e) and (m) of this subsection, may be prosecuted more than two years after its commission.(l) No misdemeanor may be prosecuted more than one year after its commission.(m) A violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 may not be prosecuted more than three years after its commission.(2) The periods of limitation prescribed in subsection (1) of this section do not run during any time when the person charged is not usually and publicly resident within this state.(3) In any prosecution for a sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, the periods of limitation prescribed in subsection (1) of this section run from the date of commission or four years from the date on which the identity of the suspect is conclusively established by deoxyribonucleic acid testing or by photograph as defined in RCW 9.68A.011, whichever is later.(4) If, before the end of a period of limitation prescribed in subsection (1) of this section, an indictment has been found or a complaint or an information has been filed, and the indictment, complaint, or information is set aside, then the period of limitation is extended by a period equal to the length of time from the finding or filing to the setting aside.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 11. A new section is added to chapter 43.59 RCW to read as follows:The Washington traffic safety commission shall develop and implement a public information campaign related to the adjustments to the breath or blood alcohol concentration threshold for impaired driving established under this act. In developing and implementing the public information campaign, the commission must:(1) Ensure television, radio, and online advertisements are provided in all areas of the state;(2) Include multiple print advertisements in the largest newspapers in each county;(3) Provide content of the public information campaign in the top nine most significant non-English-speaking languages spoken in the state;(4) Consider equity outcomes on overburdened communities as defined in RCW 70A.02.010; and(5) Ensure that at least 10 percent of the advertisements are developed in conjunction with in-state hospitality stakeholders and educate drivers about safe alternatives to driving while patronizing hospitality businesses.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 12. A new section is added to chapter 66.44 RCW to read as follows:The legislature finds that current civil law relating to civil liability is that a licensed commercial vendor or quasi-commercial vendor owes a duty to third persons not to sell, serve, or furnish alcohol to a person who is apparently under the influence of alcohol, or who is obviously intoxicated. This current civil law is both statutory and also developed in case law. The legislature further finds that civil liability to third persons under the civil law does not depend upon a finding of the blood or breath alcohol concentration. Therefore, nothing in this act shall be construed to change current civil law for civil liability of a licensed commercial vendor or quasi-commercial vendor.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 13. A new section is added to chapter 66.08 RCW to read as follows:(1) The Washington state institute forÂ public policy must conduct an evaluation of the impacts of this act during the first two years of implementation. By October 1, 2027, the institute must submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature detailing the results of its evaluation. The evaluation must include, but is not limited to, the impact of this act on:(a) The number of serious and fatal traffic crashes;(b) Driving under the influence arrests and adjudications for driving under the influence offenses;(c) Equity outcomes on overburdened communities as defined in RCW 70A.02.010;(d) Sales and other business effects on the hospitality industry in the state; and(e) Sales and other business effects on breweries, wineries, and distilleries in the state.(2) This section expires November 1, 2028.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 14. This act takes effect July 1, 2026.--- END ---